Colorado, session 2026A, HB1337.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add part 6 to article
38.5 of title 24 as follows:
PART 6
ADVANCED ENERGY DEVELOPMENT
24-38.5-601. Legislative declaration.
(1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY DECLARES THAT IT IS THE POLICY OF
-2- HB26-1337

THE STATE TO ENCOURAGE THE DEVELOPMENT OF NUCLEAR ENERGY, AND,
ACCORDINGLY, COLORADO SHALL HAVE THE GOALS OF:
(a) IDENTIFYING AT LEAST ONE NUCLEAR ENERGY PROJECT SITE BY
2035; AND
(b) BEGINNING CONSTRUCTION OF AT LEAST ONE NUCLEAR ENERGY
PROJECT BY 2040.
(2) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FURTHER DECLARES THAT THE OFFICE
SHOULD MAKE EVERY EFFORT TO SECURE FEDERAL FUNDS TO SUPPORT THE
COSTS OF IMPLEMENTATION AND DEVELOPMENT OF NUCLEAR ENERGY
PROJECTS IN THE STATE.
24-38.5-602. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS PART 6, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(1) "CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY"
MEANS A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY ISSUED BY
THE COMMISSION PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 5 OF TITLE 40.
(2) "COMMISSION" MEANS THE PUBLIC UTILITIES COMMISSION
CREATED IN SECTION 40-2-101 (1).
(3) "DEVELOPER" MEANS AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A NUCLEAR
ENERGY PROJECT.
(4) "LOCAL GOVERNMENT" MEANS A COUNTY, CITY, TOWN, OR
CITY AND COUNTY.
(5) "NUCLEAR ENERGY PROJECT" MEANS A PROJECT FOR THE
CONSTRUCTION AND OPERATION OF A NUCLEAR ENERGY RESOURCE
FACILITY.
(6) "OFFICE" MEANS THE COLORADO ENERGY OFFICE CREATED IN
SECTION 24-38.5-101.
-3- HB26-1337

(7) "PERMITTING AGENCIES" MEANS STATE AND LOCAL
GOVERNMENT AGENCIES WITH PERMITTING AUTHORITY.
24-38.5-603. Advanced nuclear energy development -
responsibilities of Colorado energy office - cost-recovery mechanism
process.
(1) THE OFFICE SHALL SERVE AS THE STATE'S PERMITTING
COORDINATOR FOR NUCLEAR ENERGY PROJECTS BY:
(a) SERVING AS A SINGLE POINT OF CONTACT FOR DEVELOPERS,
STAKEHOLDERS, AND PERMITTING AGENCIES THROUGHOUT THE
PERMITTING PROCESS;
(b) COORDINATING WITH PERMITTING AGENCIES TO STREAMLINE
PERMITTING PROCESSES AND ALIGN WITH FEDERAL PERMITTING
REQUIREMENTS; AND
(c) ASSISTING DEVELOPERS IN NAVIGATING LOCAL, STATE, AND
FEDERAL REGULATIONS.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING ANYTHING IN THIS SECTION TO THE
CONTRARY, THE UNITED STATES NUCLEAR REGULATORY COMMISSION HAS
THE EXCLUSIVE AUTHORITY TO ISSUE PERMITS RELATED TO THE
CONSTRUCTION AND OPERATION OF A NUCLEAR POWER PLANT OR REACTOR
PURSUANT TO THE FEDERAL "ATOMIC ENERGY ACT OF 1954", PUB.L.
83-703.
(3) (a) THE OFFICE SHALL:
(I) BUILD ADMINISTRATIVE AND COORDINATION CAPACITY TO
PREPARE FOR FEDERAL FUNDING OPPORTUNITIES, APPLICATIONS, AND
AWARD MANAGEMENT; AND
(II) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2027, COLLABORATE WITH
RATE-REGULATED PUBLIC UTILITIES AND RELEVANT STAKEHOLDERS TO
-4- HB26-1337

RECOMMEND TO THE COMMISSION:
(A) FACTORS THE COMMISSION SHALL CONSIDER WHEN DECIDING
WHETHER TO APPROVE A RATE-REGULATED PUBLIC UTILITY'S ACQUISITION
OF A NUCLEAR ENERGY PROJECT OR OTHER CLEAN FIRM RESOURCES; AND
(B) COST-RECOVERY MECHANISMS FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OF A
NUCLEAR ENERGY PROJECT.
(b) FOR THE PURPOSE OF MAKING RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE
COMMISSION REGARDING COST-RECOVERY MECHANISMS PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (3)(a)(II)(B) OF THIS SECTION, THE OFFICE SHALL EVALUATE
POTENTIAL COST-RECOVERY MECHANISMS OR PROCESSES RELATED TO
COST RECOVERY, INCLUDING:
(I) A PARTIAL OR PHASED CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE
AND NECESSITY FOR A NUCLEAR ENERGY PROJECT;
(II) APPROVAL OF CONCURRENT CAPITAL COST RECOVERY FOR A
NUCLEAR ENERGY PROJECT WITHIN THE CONTEXT OF A PARTIAL OR PHASED
CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY; OR
(III) APPROVAL OF COST PREMIUMS WITH A CAP.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 40-2-140 as
follows:
40-2-140. Nuclear energy projects - requests for information
- nuclear energy project siting - cost recovery - definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "DEVELOPER" MEANS AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A NUCLEAR
ENERGY PROJECT.
(b) "LOCAL GOVERNMENT" MEANS A COUNTY, CITY, TOWN, OR
CITY AND COUNTY.
-5- HB26-1337

(c) "NUCLEAR ENERGY PROJECT" MEANS A PROJECT FOR THE
CONSTRUCTION AND OPERATION OF A NUCLEAR ENERGY RESOURCE
FACILITY.
(d) "OFFICE" MEANS THE COLORADO ENERGY OFFICE CREATED IN
SECTION 24-38.5-101.
(2) (a) AN INVESTOR-OWNED ELECTRIC UTILITY WITH MORE THAN
FIVE HUNDRED THOUSAND CUSTOMERS SHALL:
(I) ON OR BEFORE AUGUST 1, 2027, SOLICIT A REQUEST FOR
INFORMATION FROM COMMUNITIES AND LOCAL GOVERNMENTS
INTERESTED IN HOSTING A NUCLEAR ENERGY PROJECT;
(II) ON OR BEFORE AUGUST 1, 2027, SOLICIT A REQUEST FOR
INFORMATION FROM POTENTIAL DEVELOPERS WITH EXPERIENCE
DEVELOPING, CONSTRUCTING, OPERATING, OR SERVICING NUCLEAR
ENERGY PROJECTS;
(III) IDENTIFY, IN COLLABORATION WITH OTHER PUBLIC UTILITIES,
LOCAL GOVERNMENTS, AND DEVELOPERS, POTENTIAL SITING
OPPORTUNITIES FOR A NUCLEAR ENERGY PROJECT, TAKING INTO ACCOUNT
THE FOLLOWING:
(A) JOBS AND WORKFORCE TRANSITION OPPORTUNITIES;
(B) EXISTING INFRASTRUCTURE, WATER, AND LAND USE
REGULATIONS; AND
(C) ENVIRONMENTAL JUSTICE AND JUST TRANSITION
CONSIDERATIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPPORT AND BENEFITS;
(IV) WHEN IDENTIFYING POTENTIAL SITES FOR NUCLEAR ENERGY
PROJECTS, GIVE PREFERENCE TO A POTENTIAL SITE FOR A NUCLEAR
ENERGY PROJECT THAT IS LOCATED IN AN ENERGY COMMUNITY, AS
DEFINED BY THE FEDERAL "INFLATION REDUCTION ACT OF 2022", PUB.L.
-6- HB26-1337

117-169; AND
(V) WHEN PRACTICABLE, ALIGN IDENTIFICATION OF POTENTIAL
SITES FOR NUCLEAR ENERGY PROJECTS WITH LARGE-LOAD SITING AND
DEVELOPMENT.
(b) THE COMMISSION SHALL ALLOW FOR EXPEDITED, UP-FRONT
COST RECOVERY FOR AN INVESTOR-OWNED ELECTRIC UTILITY WITH MORE
THAN FIVE HUNDRED THOUSAND CUSTOMERS FOR EXPENDITURES RELATED
TO THE REQUIREMENTS SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION.
(c) AN INVESTOR-OWNED ELECTRIC UTILITY WITH MORE THAN FIVE
HUNDRED THOUSAND CUSTOMERS MAY SUBMIT TO THE COMMISSION, AND
THE COMMISSION SHALL APPROVE, AN APPLICATION TO EXPEND AND
RECOVER UP TO TWENTY MILLION DOLLARS TO FINANCE STUDIES
REGARDING POTENTIAL SITES, FACILITY DESIGNS, AND OTHER ACTIVITIES
RELATED TO THE DEVELOPMENT OF NUCLEAR ENERGY PROJECTS IN THE
STATE.
(d) AN INVESTOR-OWNED ELECTRIC UTILITY WITH MORE THAN FIVE
HUNDRED THOUSAND CUSTOMERS SHALL RECOVER STUDY EXPENDITURES
APPROVED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(c) OF THIS SECTION THROUGH
AN EXISTING RATE ADJUSTMENT MECHANISM THAT IS ASSOCIATED WITH
THE COST OF GENERATION CAPACITY OR THROUGH DEFERRED ACCOUNTING
TREATMENT FOR WHICH THE DEFERRED EXPENDITURES ARE RECOVERABLE
IN THE FIRST RATE CASE SUBMITTED AFTER THE COMPLETION OF THE
STUDIES.
(3) AN INVESTOR-OWNED ELECTRIC UTILITY MAY PETITION THE
COMMISSION FOR COST RECOVERY FOR A NUCLEAR ENERGY PROJECT USING
THE COST-RECOVERY MECHANISM RECOMMENDATIONS THAT THE OFFICE
RECOMMENDS TO THE COMMISSION PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-38.5-603
-7- HB26-1337

(3)(a)(II)(B).
(4) THE COMMISSION MAY APPROVE A COST-RECOVERY
MECHANISM RECOMMENDED BY THE OFFICE PURSUANT TO SECTION
24-38.5-603 (3)(a)(II)(B). NO LATER THAN SIX MONTHS AFTER RECEIVING
A PETITION FROM AN INVESTOR-OWNED ELECTRIC UTILITY REGARDING A
COST-RECOVERY MECHANISM FOR A NUCLEAR ENERGY PROJECT, THE
COMMISSION SHALL ISSUE AN APPROVAL OR DENIAL OF THE PETITION. IN
EVALUATING THE PETITION, THE COMMISSION SHALL CONSIDER HOW
COST-RECOVERY MECHANISMS MAY INCENTIVIZE NUCLEAR ENERGY
DEVELOPMENT AND PROTECT CUSTOMER UTILITY BILLS.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1
(3) of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section,
or part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part
will not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election
to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the
date of the official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
(2) This act applies to nuclear energy projects proposed on or after
the applicable effective date of this act.
-8- HB26-1337